Alabama, session 2026rs, HB293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-11-8, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-11-8
(a)(1) HARASSMENT. A person commits the crime of
harassment if, with intent to harass, annoy, or alarm another
personindividual, he or she eitherdoes either of the
following:
a. Strikes, shoves, kicks, or otherwise touches a
person any individual or subjects him or her any individual to
physical contact.
b. Directs abusive or obscene language or makes an
obscene gesture towards toward another personindividual.
(2) For purposes of this section, harassment shall
include a threat, verbal or nonverbal, made with the intent to
carry out the threat, that would cause a reasonable person
individual who is the target of the threat to fear for his or
her safety.
(3) Harassment is a Class C misdemeanor.
(b)(1) HARASSING COMMUNICATIONS. A person commits the
crime of harassing communications if, with intent to harass or
alarm another personindividual, he or she does any of the
following:
a. Communicates with a personany individual,
anonymously or otherwise, by telephone, telegraph, mail, or
any other form of written or electronic communication, in a
manner likely to harass or cause alarm.
b. Makes a telephone call, whether or not a
Page 2

b. Makes a telephone call, whether or not a
HB293 INTRODUCED
conversation ensues, with no purpose of legitimate
communication.
c. Telephones another person individual and addresses
to or about such the other person individual any lewd or
obscene words or language.
Nothing in this section shall apply to legitimate
business telephone communications.
(2) Harassing communications is a Class C misdemeanor.
(c) If a person commits a violation of subsection (a)
or (b), and the victim is a public official, as defined in
Section 36-25-1, the person is guilty of a Class B
misdemeanor.
(d) Nothing in this section shall apply to legitimate
business telephone communications."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3